Hawaii statutes.
[§396-16] Exception for federal
jurisdiction. Nothing in this chapter shall apply to working conditions of
employees with respect to which any federal agency exercises statutory
authority to prescribe and enforce standards or regulations affecting occupational
safety or health. [L 1977, c 179, §5]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next